Louisiana, session 2026, HB800.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 70 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3301 through 330, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 70. MAKE AFFORDABLE GROCERIES AGAIN ACT
§3301. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Make Affordable
Groceries Again Act".
§3302. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the meanings ascribed to
them in this Section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Channels of trade" means the distinct and diverse pathways through
which covered goods are marketed, distributed, and sold to consumers in the United
States, including traditional supermarkets, hypermarkets, discount stores,
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1056 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 800
convenience stores, online or e-commerce retailers, specialty food stores, mass
merchandisers, wholesale clubs, and any other retail establishments, platforms, or
entities that engage in the sale of covered goods, either primarily or as a segment of
their broader retail offering, and compete for consumer grocery dollars.
(2) "Covered goods" means a grocery item, including any item described in
Paragraph (1) or (2) of the definition of eligible foods under 7 CFR 271.2, or a
consumer-packaged good. "Covered goods" does not include gasoline, prescription
drugs, tobacco, or alcoholic beverages.
(3) "Covered retailer" means a person that sells covered goods to end
purchasers at one or more physical locations in this state.
(4) "Covered supplier" means a person that satisfies all of the following:
(a) Produces and sells covered goods in this state.
(b) Sells, directly or through an agent or any third party with which the
covered supplier contracts, covered goods produced or manufactured by the person,
directly or through an agent or any third party with which the covered supplier
contracts, to covered retailers or covered wholesalers in an aggregate amount
exceeding six billion dollars, as adjusted each year by an amount equal to the
percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers
published by the United States Department of Labor, per year.
(5) "Covered wholesaler" means a person that purchases covered goods for
the purpose of reselling or distributing them to covered retailers in this state.
(6) "Dominant covered retailer" means a covered retailer that satisfies all of
the following:
(a) Has annual retail sales of covered goods in an aggregate amount
exceeding eighteen billion dollars, as adjusted each year by an amount equal to the
percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers
published by the United States Department of Labor.
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1056 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 800
(b) Operates not less than one storefront or distribution center in more than
twenty states, including this state, operated by the covered retailer, the covered
retailer's parent company, or subsidiaries of the same parent company.
(7) "Person" includes all of the following:
(a) Each entity that a person owns or controls, in whole or in part.
(b) Each entity that owns or controls the person, in whole or in part.
(8) "Pricing differential" means, with respect to the volume unit basis of a
covered good purchased by a covered retailer or covered wholesaler compared to the
volume unit basis of a product purchased by a dominant covered retailer, either of
the following:
(a) The difference in price of the product multiplied by the quantity sold.
(b) The difference in the price equivalent of the terms of sale of the product,
discounted to present value if needed to account for any difference in payment terms,
multiplied by the quantity sold.
(9) "Same covered good" means, with respect to two different covered
goods, a covered good and any other covered good sold under the same brand that
differs only in quantity or packaging.
(10) "Same terms of sale" means, with respect to two different agreements,
terms of sale that are identical on a per unit basis, excluding shipping and delivery
costs, which may vary on account of distance, speed, or method of shipping and
delivery, or availability of self-distribution.
(11) "Terms of sale" means all substantive terms and conditions of sale
commonly subject to negotiation and competition, including price, discounts,
rebates, delivery terms, payment terms, package size, promotional allowances,
marketing devices, merchandising arrangements, terms of distribution, and any other
similar terms, considered on a per unit basis as appropriate.
(12) "Volume unit basis" means the base unit of measurement, not exceeding
a truckload, by which purchase quantities are measured in purchase agreements
between a covered supplier and a covered retailer or covered wholesaler.
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1056 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 800
§3303. Ensuring price fairness; prohibited conduct
A. A covered supplier shall not, directly or through an agent, fail to extend
the same terms of sale of a covered good to all covered retailers and covered
wholesalers that purchase the covered good on the same volume unit basis in
reasonably contemporaneous sales.
B. A covered supplier shall not fail to provide, within fourteen days of a
written request from a covered retailer or covered wholesaler that has purchased a
covered good or received an offer including terms of sale for a covered good from
the covered supplier, directly or through an agent, the anonymized terms of sale from
all contracts with dominant covered retailers that purchased the same covered good
on the same volume unit basis during the one hundred eighty day period prior to the
date on which the purchase or offer including terms of sale was made.
C. A covered supplier shall not, directly or through an agent, refuse the sale
of a covered good to a covered retailer or a covered wholesaler if all of the following
conditions are met:
(1) The covered retailer is not a dominant covered retailer.
(2) The covered retailer or the covered wholesaler has made and completed
payment for purchases from the covered supplier within the previous twelve months.
(3) The covered retailer or the covered wholesaler has made a request of the
covered supplier to provide to the retailer or wholesaler the same terms of sale
provided to other covered retailers or covered wholesalers, consistent with the
provisions of this Section.
(4) The refusal by the covered supplier to sell a covered good to the covered
retailer or covered wholesaler has no commercially reasonable justification.
D. A dominant covered retailer, or its purchasing agent or any third party
through which a dominant covered retailer contracts to purchase covered goods, shall
not directly or indirectly take any action that the dominant covered retailer,
purchasing agent, or third party intends, knows, or should know will coerce or induce
a covered supplier to violate the provisions of this Section.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1056 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 800
§3304. Mandatary liability
A covered supplier or dominant covered retailer, as applicable, is liable for
any violation of R.S. 51:3303 by a contracted third party.
§3305. Defenses
A person alleged to have engaged in conduct prohibited by R.S. 51:3303 is
not liable for the conduct upon showing, by a preponderance of the evidence, any of
the following:
(1) Any difference in the terms of sale was predominantly attributable to a
covered retailer engaging in self-distribution of the covered good at issue or
otherwise lowering the overall costs of the covered supplier through genuine
efficiencies including but not limited to economies in distribution or manufacturing.
(2) A covered retailer, in exchange for commercially reasonable
consideration, voluntarily accepted terms of sale relating to a covered good that were
not the same terms of sale as the terms of sale offered to another covered retailer.
(3) The terms of sale applied only in cases in which there was an actual or
imminent deterioration of perishable goods, obsolescence of seasonal goods, distress
sales under court process, or sales in good faith in discontinuance of business in the
goods concerned.
§3306. Covered supplier immunity
If a covered supplier did not collude with a dominant covered retailer in any
scheme that violates the antitrust laws, a covered supplier is immune from liability
for a violation of R.S. 51:3303 if the defendant covered supplier shows by a
preponderance of the evidence all of the following:
(1) The violation was imposed on or required of the defendant covered
supplier by a dominant covered retailer.
(2) The defendant covered supplier would have suffered substantial harm to
its business if it had refused the demand of the dominant covered retailer.
(3) The defendant covered supplier made a good faith effort to disclose the
dominant covered retailer's conduct to the office of the attorney general.
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1056 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 800
§3307. Enforcement
The attorney general or a covered retailer, covered wholesaler, or covered
supplier injured by a violation of this Chapter may file suit for any of the following:
(1) An injunction to cure a violation of this Chapter.
(2) A civil penalty or damages in an amount not greater than either of the
following:
(a) One and one-half times the actual damages.
(b) The pricing differential suffered by a covered retailer or a covered
wholesaler.
(3) Both an injunction pursuant to Subsection (1) of this Section and a civil
penalty or damages pursuant to Subsection (2) of this Section.
§3308. Rules of construction
A. As used in this Chapter, "antitrust laws":
(1) Has the meaning given that term in Subsection (a) of the first section of
the Clayton Act 15 U.S.C. 12(a).
(2) Includes 15 U.S.C. 45 to the extent that Section 45 applies to unfair
methods of competition.
(3) Includes any Louisiana law similar to the laws described in Paragraphs
(1) and (2) of this Subsection.
B. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to limit, impair, or supersede
any of the antitrust laws.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1056 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 800